Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216G.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216G.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Pipeline abandonment. new text end new text begin "Pipeline abandonment" means to permanently cease service along a portion of or the entirety of a pipeline route in Minnesota. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [216G.095] PIPELINE ABANDONMENT; RESPONSIBILITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin No later than 60 days before the date pipeline operations are scheduled to cease, a pipeline owner must provide each landowner whose land the pipeline traverses written notice of the pipeline owner's intent to cease pipeline operations. The notice must contain the language of this section and section 216G.13. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Removal of abandoned pipeline. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in subdivision 4, a pipeline owner whose easement interests have reverted to the landowner under section 216G.09 or who has otherwise ceased operating the pipeline is responsible for removing: (1) any and all abandoned property from the landowner's property, including pipelines, pumping, metering, or compressor stations; and (2) all other infrastructure and ancillary equipment remaining on the landowner's property. The pipeline owner bears the financial responsibility for the removal and is liable for environmental cleanup and remediation costs required under chapter 115B. new text end new text begin (b) A landowner who wants an abandoned pipeline or other ancillary infrastructure and equipment removed from the landowner's land must submit a notarized written removal request to the pipeline owner. The removal request must stipulate the specific infrastructure and equipment that the landowner requests the pipeline owner remove. The landowner must submit a copy of the request to the Public Utilities Commission, the Pollution Control Agency, the Department of Natural Resources, the Board of Soil and Water Resources, and the appropriate county recorder and soil and water conservation district. new text end new text begin (c) Within 60 days of the date a pipeline owner receives a request to remove an abandoned pipeline under paragraph (b), the pipeline owner must purge the abandoned pipeline of all materials transported by the pipeline. The pipeline owner must certify the abandoned pipeline has been purged in a written notice sent to the landowner and the agencies listed in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) A pipeline owner must begin removing an abandoned pipeline and other infrastructure the landowner requested the pipeline owner to remove within 30 days of the date the certification notice under paragraph (c) is sent. The pipeline owner must complete removal within 90 days of the date the certification notice is sent. new text end new text begin (e) A pipeline owner is liable for any releases or damages that result from removing an abandoned pipeline or other infrastructure and equipment. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Land restoration. new text end new text begin The pipeline owner is responsible for all reasonable costs associated with restoring the land on which an abandoned pipeline's operations were conducted. Restoring the land under this subdivision includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) restoring the land contour to control soil erosion, to minimize adverse effects on water quality, complement nearby terrain, and facilitate the prompt conversion of the land to the use desired by the landowner; new text end new text begin (2) replacing topsoil to a depth equal to or greater than the average depth of topsoil on land adjoining the landowner's land; new text end new text begin (3) establishing a permanent vegetative cover that is self-sustaining and regenerating, and that protects soil and water quality; and new text end new text begin (4) removing invasive plant species listed by the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Agriculture, or the county weed inspector of the applicable county. Activities undertaken to control invasive plant species must be effective for five consecutive years, as determined from inspection by the county weed inspector, after which the pipeline owner's responsibility to control invasive plant species terminates. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Abandoned pipeline left in place. new text end new text begin (a) A landowner may relieve a pipeline owner of the requirement to remove an abandoned pipeline that is subject to section 216G.09 or has otherwise been abandoned by submitting a notarized written request to the pipeline owner that the pipeline be left in place. The written request may also address the disposition of other abandoned property, including pumping, metering, or compressor stations, and other infrastructure and ancillary equipment remaining on the landowner's property. A landowner must submit a copy of the request to the Public Utilities Commission, the Pollution Control Agency, the Department of Natural Resources, the Board of Soil and Water Resources, and the appropriate county recorder and soil and water conservation district. new text end new text begin (b) A pipeline owner must comply with all federal regulations governing an abandoned pipeline, including the requirement to purge the abandoned pipeline of all materials transported by the pipeline. Within 90 days of the date a pipeline owner receives notice under paragraph (a), the pipeline owner must submit written certification of compliance with federal regulations regarding abandoned pipelines to the landowner and to the agencies listed in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) A landowner who requests that a pipeline owner leave an abandoned pipeline left in place under this subdivision assumes all future liabilities associated with the abandoned pipeline and any other infrastructure left in place, including subsequent costs of abandoned pipeline and infrastructure removal, land restoration, and environmental remediation under chapter 115B, except that a pipeline owner is responsible for paying the costs of future monitoring and inspection of both the abandoned pipeline left in place and the abandoned pipeline's surrounding environment. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [216G.13] ABANDONMENT PLAN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Approval required. new text end new text begin A pipeline must not be abandoned in Minnesota unless the commissioner approves a pipeline abandonment plan that meets the requirements of this section. When approving a pipeline abandonment plan, the commissioner may establish conditions that apply to the abandonment process and to the abandoned pipeline for the duration of the time that the abandoned pipeline remains in the ground. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Consultation; public hearing required. new text end new text begin When developing a pipeline abandonment plan, a pipeline owner must contact and consult with interested stakeholders, including but not limited to: (1) owners of land or Tribal governments having jurisdiction through treaty rights for land on which the abandoned pipeline is located; (2) state and local government agencies responsible for land development and maintaining the quality of water bodies near the pipeline; and (3) environmental organizations. The pipeline owner must hold at least one public hearing, as determined by the commissioner, to allow stakeholders and members of the public to provide input on the abandonment plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plan content. new text end new text begin A pipeline abandonment plan must contain the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a general description of the pipeline and the pipeline's ancillary facilities, including a history of the pipeline's operation and the products the pipeline has carried; new text end new text begin (2) a schedule of the proposed abandonment process; new text end new text begin (3) a map showing the location of the pipeline; right-of-way; pumping stations, storage areas, and other ancillary facilities; water bodies along and near the pipeline route; road, rail, and utility crossings; and environmentally sensitive resources on or near the pipeline route; new text end new text begin (4) a detailed description of the facilities to be abandoned, including: new text end new text begin (i) the pipeline's composition, diameter, thickness, and coatings; new text end new text begin (ii) ancillary pipeline facilities; and new text end new text begin (iii) other facilities on nearby land owned by the pipeline owner; new text end new text begin (5) a detailed description of the land adjacent to the pipeline, including: new text end new text begin (i) land uses; new text end new text begin (ii) natural features, including water bodies, wetlands, karst areas, rare vegetation, and animal species; and new text end new text begin (iii) the identity of landowners and land administration agencies, and the land parcels each owns or administers; new text end new text begin (6) a history of pipeline ruptures, leaks, and repairs; new text end new text begin (7) facilities to be left in place, including: new text end new text begin (i) locations; new text end new text begin (ii) reasons for leaving the facilities in place; new text end new text begin (iii) mitigation measures that the pipeline owner must take in order to reduce environmental and safety risks, including cleaning and plugging pipe, segmenting pipe, and efforts to prevent water movement; and new text end new text begin (iv) an estimate of risks from soil subsidence, pipe collapse, pipe corrosion, soil erosion, and contamination removal; new text end new text begin (8) facilities to be removed, including: new text end new text begin (i) facility locations; new text end new text begin (ii) reasons for removal; new text end new text begin (iii) cleaning and removal procedures; and new text end new text begin (iv) pipeline recycling and reuse plans; new text end new text begin (9) land reclamation activities; new text end new text begin (10) performance measures that evaluate the abandonment process, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) removing soil and water contamination; new text end new text begin (ii) protecting sensitive environmental areas; new text end new text begin (iii) protecting utility and transportation crossings; and new text end new text begin (iv) managing the long-term effects of the abandoned pipeline on the land; new text end new text begin (11) a statement of responsibility for facilities left in place; new text end new text begin (12) a postabandonment monitoring and maintenance schedule; new text end new text begin (13) abandonment costs and the adequacy of the pipeline's financial assurance funds to pay for both initial and ongoing costs; and new text end new text begin (14) any additional information required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end